test/src/gt-norm-yamls/U-all_gt-norm.yaml
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-wîcihit, êwîcihit]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-wîcihisk, êwîcihisk]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhk, êwîcihikoyâhk]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyahk, êwîcihikoyahk]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyek, êwîcihikoyek]

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-wîcihiticik, êwîcihiticik]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-wîcihiskik, êwîcihiskik]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhkik, êwîcihikoyâhkik]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyahkok, êwîcihikoyahkok]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyêkok, êwîcihikoyêkok]

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihikot, êwîcihikot]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihikocik, êwîcihikocik]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyit, êwîcihikoyit]

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-wîcihitân, êwîcihitân]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: [ê-wîcihitâhk, êwîcihitâhk]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: [ê-wîcihitâhk, êwîcihitâhk]
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-wîcihitakok, êwîcihitakok]

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wîcih
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâtân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihihk
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihik
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâtânik
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihihkok

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihâhkan
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkahk
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkêk
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihâhkanik
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkahkok
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkêkok

     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihin
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihinân
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihik
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihîhkan
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihîhkâhk
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihîhkêk

  
  Verb - kâtâ - asfd : # Wolvengrey VTI2 verb, p. 399
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: kâtâ
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: kâtâtân
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: kâtâk
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: kâtâhkan
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: kâtâhkahk
     kâtâw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: kâtâhkêk

     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nikâtân
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kikâtân
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nikâtânân
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kikâtânânaw, kikâtânaw]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kikâtânâwâw
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kâtâw
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: kâtâwak
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Sg: kâtâyiwa
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: kâtâyiwa

     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikîkâtân, nikî-kâtân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikîkâtân, kikî-kâtân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikîkâtânân, nikî-kâtânân]

     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [êkâtâyân, ê-kâtâyân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [êkâtâyan, ê-kâtâyan]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [êkâtâyâhk, ê-kâtâyâhk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [êkâtâyahk, ê-kâtâyahk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [êkâtâyêk, ê-kâtâyêk]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [êkâtât, ê-kâtât]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [êkâtâcik, ê-kâtâcik]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [êkâtâyit, ê-kâtâyit]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [êkâtâyit, ê-kâtâyit]
 
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [êkîkâtâyân, êkî-kâtâyân, ê-kîkâtâyân, ê-kî-kâtâyân]
     kâtâw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [êkîkâtâyan, êkî-kâtâyan, ê-kîkâtâyan, ê-kî-kâtâyan]


  
  Verb - mâham -  : # Ordinary VTI am-final verb,  Wolvengrey p 397
     mâham+V+TI: mâha
     mâham+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mâha
     mâham+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mâhamok
     mâham+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mâhêtân
     mâham+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mâhamôhkan
     mâham+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mâhamôhkêk
     mâham+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mâhamôhkahk

     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimâhên
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimâhên
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mâham
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Sg: mâhamiyiwa
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimâhênân
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kimâhênânaw
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimâhênaw, kimâhênânaw]
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimâhênâwâw
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mâhamwak
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: mâhamiyiwa

     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikîmâhên, nikî-mâhên]
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikîmâhên, kikî-mâhên]
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kîmâham, kî-mâham]

     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nikamâhên,nika-mâhên]
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kikamâhên, kika-mâhên]
     mâham+V+TI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [kamâham, ka-mâham]

     mâham+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [êmâhamân, ê-mâhamân]
     mâham+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [êmâhaman, ê-mâhaman]
     mâham+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [êmâhahk, ê-mâhahk]
     mâham+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [êmâhamiyit, ê-mâhamiyit]
     mâham+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [êmâhamâhk, ê-mâhamâhk]
     mâham+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [êmâhamahk, ê-mâhamahk]
     mâham+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [êmâhamêk, ê-mâhamêk]
     mâham+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [êmâhahkik, ê-mâhahkik]


  
  Verb - mîci - ok : # Wolvengrey VTI3 verb - p. 400 
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîci
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mîcitân
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mîcik
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mîcihkan
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mîcihkahk
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mîcihkêk

     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimîcin
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimîcin
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimîcinân
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimîcinaw, kimîcinânaw]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimîcinâwâw
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mîciw
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mîciwak
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: mîciyiwa

     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikîmîcin, nikî-mîcin]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikîmîcin, kikî-mîcin]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikîmîcinân, nikî-mîcinân]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikîmîcinaw, kikî-mîcinaw, kikîmîcinânaw, kikî-mîcinânaw]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikîmîcinâwâw, kikî-mîcinâwâw]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kîmîciw, kî-mîciw]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-mîciwak, kîmîciwak]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kî-mîciyiwa, kîmîciyiwa]

     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mîciyân, êmîciyân]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mîciyan, êmîciyan]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mîciyâhk, êmîciyâhk]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mîciyahk, êmîciyahk]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mîciyêk, êmîciyêk]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mîcit, êmîcit]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mîcicik, êmîcicik]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-mîciyit, êmîciyit]

     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [ê-kîmîciyân, ê-kî-mîciyân, êkîmîciyân, êkî-mîciyân]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [ê-kîmîciyan, ê-kî-mîciyan, êkî-mîciyan, êkîmîciyan]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: [ê-kîmîciyâhk, ê-kî-mîciyâhk, êkî-mîciyâhk, êkîmîciyâhk]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: [ê-kîmîciyahk, ê-kî-mîciyahk, ê-kîmîciyahk, ê-kî-mîciyahk, êkî-mîciyahk, êkîmîciyahk]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: [ê-kîmîciyêk, ê-kî-mîciyêk, êkî-mîciyêk, êkîmîciyêk]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kîmîcit, ê-kî-mîcit, êkîmîcit, êkî-mîcit]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-mîcicik, ê-kîmîcicik, êkî-mîcicik, êkîmîcicik]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+Prt+4Pl: [ê-kî-mîciyit, ê-kîmîciyit, êkî-mîciyit, êkîmîciyit]


  Verb - wâpahta -  : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
  
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: wâpahta
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: wâpahtêtân
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: wâpahtamok
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: wâpahtamôhkan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: wâpahtamôhkahk
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: wâpahtamôhkêk

     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: niwâpahtên
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kiwâpahtên
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: niwâpahtênân
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kiwâpahtênaw, kiwâpahtênânaw]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kiwâpahtênâwâw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: wâpahtam
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: wâpahtamwak
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: wâpahtamiyiwa

     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [êwâpahtamân, ê-wâpahtamân]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [êwâpahtaman, ê-wâpahtaman]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [êwâpahtamâhk, ê-wâpahtamâhk]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [êwâpahtamahk, ê-wâpahtamahk]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [êwâpahtamêk, ê-wâpahtamêk]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [êwâpahtahk, ê-wâpahtahk]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [êwâpahtahkik, ê-wâpahtahkik]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [êwâpahtamiyit, ê-wâpahtamiyit]


     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikîwâpahtên, nikî-wâpahtên]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikîwâpahtên, kikî-wâpahtên]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikîwâpahtênân, nikî-wâpahtênân]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikîwâpahtênaw, kikî-wâpahtênaw, kikîwâpahtênânaw, kikî-wâpahtênânaw]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikîwâpahtênâwâw, kikî-wâpahtênâwâw]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kîwâpahtam, kî-wâpahtam]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-wâpahtamwak, kîwâpahtamwak]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kîwâpahtamiyiwa, kî-wâpahtamiyiwa]
